Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1910
Undergraduate student, defined.

Undergraduate student means an individual who has not earned a first baccalaureate or professional degree and is enrolled in a postsecondary educational program which leads to, or is creditable toward, a first baccalaureate degree, associate degree, certificate, diploma, or equivalent.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 10.